Wisconsin, session 2025, SB29.
do enact as follows:SB29,11Section 1. 119.04 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB29,2,152119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 366.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 4115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 5115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 118.10, 6118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 7118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) 8(c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.258, 118.291, 118.292, 9118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 10118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), and (15) to (27), and (29), 120.125, 120.13 (1), 11(2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 12120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school 13district and board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms 14of a contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity 15schools and partnership program.SB29,216Section 2. 120.12 (29) of the statutes is created to read:SB29,2,2217120.12 (29) Prohibited uses of wireless communication devices. (a) By 18July 1, 2026, adopt a wireless communication device policy that prohibits pupils 19from using a wireless communication device during instructional time. A school 20board may include in the policy under this paragraph consequences for a pupil 21violating the policy, including confiscating a pupil’s wireless communication device 22for the remainder of the school day.SB29,3,11(b) Include all of the following in a policy under par. (a):SB29,3,421. That "wireless communication device" means a portable wireless device 3that has the capability to provide voice, messaging, or other data communication 4between 2 or more parties and includes all of the following:SB29,3,55a. A cellular telephone.SB29,3,66b. A tablet computer.SB29,3,77c. A laptop computer.SB29,3,88d. A gaming device.SB29,3,992. Exceptions to the prohibition required under par. (a) for all of the following:SB29,3,1010a. In the event of an emergency or a perceived threat.SB29,3,1111b. To manage the pupil’s health care.SB29,3,1312c. A use included in a pupil’s individualized education program or a plan 13developed under section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973.SB29,3,1514d. A use authorized by a teacher for educational purposes during instructional 15time.SB29,3,17163. Other exceptions to the prohibition required under par. (a) if the school 17board determines doing so is beneficial to pupil learning or well-being.SB29,3,1818